Utah statutes.
63B-1-302.   Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1)  it is the policy of this state to provide office space and related facilities for state bodies and such other governmental facilities and property, including highways and highway rights-of-way, as may be necessary or desirable, in the most efficient and economical way possible;

(2)  many state bodies are inadequately provided with necessary office space, related facilities, other governmental facilities, and property to serve the public welfare;

(3)  the state is renting space for state bodies in privately owned buildings with funds which could more efficiently and economically be put to use toward the purchase and acquisition of  facilities by the state;

(4)  in order to provide for a fully adequate supply of office space, related facilities, other governmental facilities, and property at the lowest possible cost, this Legislature should establish a State Building Ownership Authority for the purpose of financing, owning, leasing, operating, or encumbering such facilities to meet the needs of the state government and to serve the public welfare;

(5)  the foregoing involve public purposes and uses for which public money may be borrowed, expended, advanced, loaned, or granted, the activities specified would serve a public purpose in improving or otherwise benefiting the people of this state and, therefore, this part is in the public interest and is declared to be in the public interest as a matter of express legislative determination; and

(6)  the compelling need within this state for the creation of an adequate supply of office space, related facilities, other government facilities, and property for state bodies at a low cost can be best met by the establishment of a body corporate and politic vested with the powers and duties specified in this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 86, 2003 General Session

